Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Chapter 38. Alaska Exemptions Act.
Sec. 09.38.085.
Contents of notice; forms.

The notice required by AS

09.38.075(b)

and

09.38.080(c)

must include the following information:

the amount and date of the judgment to be enforced by levy and sale or other mode of appropriating the individual’s property;

the name and address of the clerk of the court with whom objections must be filed;

the name and address of the creditor and of the creditor’s attorney, if any;

a copy of the affidavit filed under AS

09.38.080(b)

;

a summary statement in lay terminology of the exemptions provided by the laws of this state;

a summary statement in lay terminology of the procedures for claiming exemptions, objecting to a levy on exempt property, changing venue, and exercising the right to repurchase homestead property from a sale before its confirmation; and

a statement in lay terminology of the rights of persons other than the individual as provided in AS

09.38.090

.

The supreme court may prescribe forms to be used by creditors, debtors, and court officers under this chapter.

A notice substantially complying with this section is effective even though the notice contains errors if those errors do not result in substantial prejudice to the rights of the individual debtor or of the dependents of the individual debtor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as the second sentence of (b), but was redesignated in 1982.

Sec. 09.38.090.
Assertion of rights by another.

If an individual fails to select property entitled to be claimed as exempt or to object to a levy on the property or to assert any other right under this chapter, the spouse or a dependent of the individual or any other person authorized by law may make the claim or objection or assert the rights provided by this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 1982)

Sec. 09.38.095.
Judicial relief.

An individual or the spouse, a dependent of the individual, or any other person authorized by law is entitled to injunctive relief, damages, or both, against a creditor or other person to prevent or redress a violation of this chapter as provided in the Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure. A court may award costs and reasonable attorney fees to a party entitled to injunctive relief or damages.

For cause shown the court may relieve a person from the consequences of failing to take timely action to assert rights under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 1982)

Sec. 09.38.100.
Debtor’s property owned with another.

If an individual and another own property in this state as tenants in common or tenants by the entirety, a creditor of the individual, subject to the individual’s right to claim an exemption under this chapter, may obtain a levy on and sale of the interest of the individual in the property. A creditor who has obtained a levy, or a purchaser who has purchased the individual’s interest at the sale, may have the property partitioned or the individual’s interest severed.

A partner’s right in specific partnership property is exempt except on a claim against the partnership. If partnership property is attached for a partnership debt, the partners or any of them or the representatives of a deceased partner may not claim an exemption for that property under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 1982)

Sec. 09.38.105.
Waiver of exemption.

A waiver of exemption executed in favor of an unsecured creditor before levy on an individual’s property is unenforceable, but a valid security interest may be given in exempt property.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 1982)

Sec. 09.38.110.
Federal requirements.

If a federal department or agency issues a formal ruling that a section of this chapter relating to public assistance will cause a state plan for the delivery of services or benefits to be out of conformity with federal requirements, the section will not apply to the extent that it causes the program to be out of conformity with federal requirements.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 1982)

Sec. 09.38.115.
Adjustment of dollar amounts.

The dollar amounts in this chapter change, as provided in this section, according to and to the extent of changes in the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for the Anchorage Metropolitan Area compiled by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, United States Department of Labor (the index). The index for January of 1982 is the reference base index.

The dollar amounts change on October 1 of each even-numbered year if the percentage of change, calculated to the nearest whole percentage point, between the index for January of that year and the most recent index used to change the exemption amount, is 10 percent or more, but

the portion of the percentage change in the index in excess of a multiple of 10 percent is disregarded and the dollar amounts change only in multiples of 10 percent of the amounts appearing in this chapter on August 26, 1982; and

the dollar amounts do not change if the amounts required by this section are those currently in effect as a result of earlier application of this section.

If the index is revised, the percentage of change is calculated on the basis of the revised index. If a revision of the index changes the reference base index, a revised reference base index is determined by multiplying the reference base index applicable by the rebasing factor furnished by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. If the index is superseded, the index referred to in this section is the one represented by the Bureau of Labor Statistics as reflecting most accurately changes in the purchasing power of the dollar for Alaskan consumers.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall adopt a regulation announcing

on or before June 30 of each year in which dollar amounts are to change, the changes in dollar amounts required by (b) of this section; and

promptly after the changes occur, changes in the index required by (c) of this section, including, if applicable, the numerical equivalent of the reference base index under a revised reference base index and the designation or title of any index superseding the index.

The Department of Labor and Workforce Development shall also provide notification of a change in exemption amounts required under (c) of this section to the clerks of court in each judicial district of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 1982; am § 37 ch 6 SLA 1984; am §§ 18, 19 ch 14 SLA 1987)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in (d) and (e) of this section in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For current exemption amounts, see 8 Alaska Administrative Code 95.030.

Administrative Code. —

For adjustments to Alaska exemptions act, see 8 AAC 95.

Sec. 09.38.120.
Protection of property of residents and nonresidents.

Residents of this state are entitled to the exemptions provided under this chapter. Nonresidents are entitled to the exemptions provided by the law of the jurisdiction of their residence.

The term “resident” means an individual who is physically present in the state and who intends to maintain a permanent home in Alaska.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 1982)

Sec. 09.38.500.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“burial plot” means a parcel of real estate that is used for burial of human remains and that is located within an area designated for cemetery purposes by the state or a municipality;

“creditor” includes the state on behalf of a victim of a crime or a delinquent act;

“debt” means a legally enforceable monetary obligation or liability of an individual, whether arising out of contract, tort, or otherwise;

“dependent” means an individual who derives support primarily from another individual;

“earnings” means money received by an individual for personal services and denominated as wages, salary, commissions, or otherwise;

“exempt” means protected, and “exemption” means protection, from subjection to process or a proceeding to collect an unsecured debt;

“household goods” includes those items that make a residence habitable according to modern standards;

“judgment of restitution”

includes restitution ordered

under AS

47.12.120

that is considered as a civil judgment enforceable by execution under AS

47.12.170

; and

as part of a sentence under AS

12.55.025(f)

that is considered as a judgment for money entered in a civil action;

does not include a judgment for

civil damages for torts under state law; or

restitution as a result of a violation of state law that is not a felony or misdemeanor;

“judicial lien” means a lien on property obtained by judgment, levy, sequestration, or other legal or equitable process or proceeding instituted for the purpose of collecting an unsecured debt;

“levy” means the seizure of property under a writ of attachment, garnishment, execution, or any similar legal or equitable process issued for the purpose of collecting an unsecured debt;

“lien” means

a security interest;

a judicial or statutory lien;

a common law lien on property

only if the lien was consented to by the owner of the property affected; or

if not consented to by the owner of the property affected as provided in (i) of this subparagraph, only when the lien is accompanied by a specific order authorizing the recording or filing of the lien issued by a court of competent jurisdiction recognized under state or federal law, which order shall be recorded or filed with the lien; or

any interest in property other than one described in (A) — (C) of this paragraph securing payment of a debt or performance of an obligation;

“principal residence” means the actual dwelling place of an individual or dependents of the individual and includes real and personal property;

“security interest” means an interest in property created by contract to secure payment or performance of an obligation;

“serve notice” means to give the person to be served a written personal notice in the same manner a summons in a civil action is served, or to mail the notice to the person’s last known address by first-class mail and by using a form of mail requiring a signed receipt;

“statutory lien” means a lien arising by force of a statute under specified circumstances or conditions, but does not include a security interest;

“value” means fair market value of an individual’s interest in property, exclusive of liens of record;

“victim” has the meaning given in AS

12.55.185

;

“victim of a crime or a delinquent act” means a victim of a crime or a delinquent act committed in violation of state law; “victim of a crime or a delinquent act” does not include a victim of a violator of an ordinance of a political subdivision of the state;

“wearing apparel” means clothing and garments intended and adapted to be worn on the person to protect the person against the elements or to provide personal comfort or decency, or serving to ornament the person but does not include jewelry.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 1982; am § 13 ch 23 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 92 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 09.38.125. Renumbered in 1982.

Reorganized in 2001 to retain alphabetical order.

Sec. 09.38.510.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Exemptions Act.

History.

(§ 2 ch 62 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 09.38.130. Renumbered in 1982.